Massachusetts, session 194th, H2292.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1A of Chapter 40A of the General laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition,
is hereby amended by striking the definition of “MBTA community” and inserting in place
thereof the following:
“MBTA community”, any city or town that is located in the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts
of 1